California statutes. Business and Professions Code
1695.4.

The board shall administer the provisions of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1261, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1695.5.

(a) The board shall establish criteria for the acceptance, denial, or termination of licentiates in a diversion program. Unless ordered by the board as a condition of licentiate disciplinary probation, only those licentiates who have voluntarily requested diversion treatment and supervision by a committee shall participate in a diversion program.

(b) A licentiate who is not the subject of a current investigation may self-refer to the diversion program on a confidential basis, except as provided in subdivision (f).

(c) A licentiate under current investigation by the board may also request entry into the diversion
 program by contacting the board’s Diversion Program Manager. The Diversion Program Manager may refer the licentiate requesting participation in the program to a diversion evaluation committee for evaluation of eligibility. Prior to authorizing a licentiate to enter into the diversion program, the Diversion Program Manager may require the licentiate, while under current investigation for any violations of the Dental Practice Act or other violations, to execute a statement of understanding that states that the licentiate understands that his or her violations of the Dental Practice Act or other statutes that would otherwise be the basis for discipline, may still be investigated and the subject of disciplinary action.

(d) If the reasons for a current investigation of a licentiate are based primarily on the self-administration of any controlled substance or dangerous drugs or alcohol under Section 1681, or the illegal possession, prescription, or
 nonviolent procurement of any controlled substance or dangerous drugs for self-administration that does not involve actual, direct harm to the public, the board shall close the investigation without further action if the licentiate is accepted into the board’s diversion program and successfully completes the requirements of the program. If the licentiate withdraws or is terminated from the program by a diversion evaluation committee, and the termination is approved by the program manager, the investigation shall be reopened and disciplinary action imposed, if warranted, as determined by the board.

(e) Neither acceptance nor participation in the diversion program shall preclude the board from investigating or continuing to investigate, or taking disciplinary action or continuing to take disciplinary action against, any licentiate for any unprofessional conduct committed before, during, or after participation in the diversion program.

(f) If a licentiate withdraws or is terminated from the diversion program for failure to comply or is determined to be a threat to the public or his or her own health and safety, all diversion records for that licentiate shall be provided to the board’s enforcement program and may be used in any disciplinary proceeding. If a licentiate in a diversion program tests positive for any banned substance, the board’s diversion program manager shall immediately notify the board’s enforcement program and provide the documentation evidencing the positive test result to the enforcement program. This documentation may be used in a disciplinary proceeding.

(g) Any licentiate terminated from the diversion program for failure to comply with program requirements is subject to disciplinary action by the board for acts committed before, during, and after participation in the diversion program. A
 licentiate who has been under investigation by the board and has been terminated from the diversion program by a diversion evaluation committee shall be reported by the diversion evaluation committee to the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 385, Sec. 11.   (SB 540)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1695.6.

A committee created under this article operates under the direction of the program manager. The program manager has the primary responsibility to review and evaluate recommendations of the committee. Each committee shall have the following duties and responsibilities:

(a) To evaluate those licentiates who request to participate in the diversion program according to the guidelines prescribed by the board and to make recommendations. In making the recommendations, a committee shall consider the recommendations of any licentiates designated by the board to serve as consultants on the admission of the licentiate to the diversion program.

(b) To review and designate those treatment facilities to which licentiates in a diversion program may be referred.

(c) To receive and review information concerning a licentiate participating in the program.

(d) To consider in the case of each licentiate participating in a program whether he or she may with safety continue or resume the practice of dentistry.

(e) To perform such other related duties, under the direction of the board or program manager, as the board may by regulation require.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 548, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

1696.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Article 9 (commencing with Section 11120) of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, relating to public meetings, a committee may convene in closed session to consider reports pertaining to any licentiate requesting or participating in a diversion program. A committee shall only convene in closed session to the extent that it is necessary to protect the privacy of such a licentiate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 589, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

1697.

Each licentiate who requests participation in a diversion program shall agree to cooperate with the treatment program designed by the committee and approved by the program manager and to bear all costs related to the program, unless the cost is waived by the board. Any failure to comply with the provisions of a treatment program may result in termination of the licentiate’s participation in a program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 548, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

1698.

(a) After the committee and the program manager in their discretion have determined that a licentiate has been rehabilitated and the diversion program is completed, the committee shall purge and destroy all records pertaining to the licentiate’s participation in a diversion program.

(b) Except as authorized by subdivision (f) of Section 1695.5, all board and committee records and records of proceedings pertaining to the treatment of a licentiate in a program shall be kept confidential and are not subject to discovery or subpoena.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 548, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

1699.

The board shall provide for the representation of any person making reports to a committee or the board under this article in any action for defamation for reports or information given to the committee or the board regarding a licentiate’s participation in the diversion program.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1261, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Offenses Against This Chapter [1700. - 1707.]

1700.

Any person, company, or association is guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction thereof shall be punished by imprisonment in the county jail not less than 10 days nor more than one year, or by a fine of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500), or by both fine and imprisonment, who:

(a) Assumes the degree of “doctor of dental surgery,” “doctor of dental science,” or “doctor of dental medicine” or appends the letters “D.D.S.,” or “D.D.Sc.” or “D.M.D.” to their name without having had the right to assume the title conferred upon them by diploma from a recognized dental college or school legally empowered to confer the same.

(b) Assumes any title, or appends any letters to their name, with the intent to represent falsely that they have received a dental degree or license.

(c) Engages in the practice of dentistry without causing to be displayed in an area that is likely to be seen by all patients who use the facility, the original or copy of the current license, permit, or registration of each person employed at the facility to practice dentistry.

(d) Within 10 days after demand is made by the executive officer of the board, fails to furnish to the board the name and address of all persons practicing or assisting in the practice of dentistry in the office of the person, company, or association, at any time within 60 days prior to the demand, together with a sworn statement showing under and by what license or authority this person, company, or association and any employees are or have been
 practicing dentistry. This sworn statement shall not be used in any prosecution under this section.

(e) Is under the influence of alcohol or a controlled substance while engaged in the practice of dentistry in actual attendance on patients to an extent that impairs their ability to conduct the practice of dentistry with safety to patients and the public.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 483, Sec. 36.   (SB 1453)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1700.5.

Notwithstanding Section 1700, any person who holds a valid, unrevoked, and unsuspended certificate as a dentist under this chapter may append the letters “D.D.S.” to his or her name, regardless of the degree conferred upon him or her by the dental college from which the licensee graduated.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 792, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

1701.

(a) Any person is for the first offense guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be punishable by a fine of not less than two hundred dollars ($200) or more than three thousand dollars ($3,000), or by imprisonment in a county jail for not to exceed six months, or both, and for the second or a subsequent offense is guilty of a felony and upon conviction thereof shall be punished by a fine of not less than two thousand dollars ($2,000) nor more than six thousand dollars ($6,000), or by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code, or by both such fine and imprisonment, who:

(1) Sells or barters or offers to sell or barter any dental degree or any license or transcript made or purporting to be made pursuant to the laws regulating the license and
 registration of dentists.

(2) Purchases or procures by barter any such diploma, license or transcript with intent that the same shall be used in evidence of the holder’s qualification to practice dentistry, or in fraud of the laws regulating such practice.

(3) With fraudulent intent, makes or attempts to make, counterfeits or alters in a material regard any such diploma, certificate or transcript.

(4) Uses, attempts or causes to be used, any such diploma, certificate or transcript that has been purchased, fraudulently issued, counterfeited or materially altered, either as a license to practice dentistry, or in order to procure registration as a dentist.

(5) In an affidavit, required of an applicant for examination, license or registration under this
 chapter, willfully makes a false statement in a material regard.

(6) Practices dentistry or offers to practice dentistry as it is defined in this chapter, either without a license, or when the license has been revoked or suspended.

(7) Under any false, assumed or fictitious name, either as an individual, firm, corporation or otherwise, or any name other than the name under which the license is issued, the licensee practices, advertises or in any other manner indicates that the licensee is practicing or will practice dentistry, except such name as is specified in a valid permit issued pursuant to Section 1701.5.

(b) The board may post an administrative citation issued pursuant to Section 148 on the board’s internet website for an offense described in subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 483, Sec. 37.   (SB 1453)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1701.1.

(a) Notwithstanding Sections 1700 and 1701, a person who willfully, under circumstances or conditions that cause or create risk of bodily harm, serious physical or mental illness, or death, practices or attempts to practice, or advertises or holds themselves out as practicing dentistry without having at the time of so doing a valid, unrevoked, and unsuspended certificate, license, registration, or permit as provided in this chapter, or without being authorized to perform that act pursuant to a certificate, license, registration, or permit obtained in accordance with some other provision of law, is guilty of a public offense, punishable by a fine not exceeding ten thousand dollars ($10,000), by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code, by imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding one year, or
 by both the fine and either imprisonment.

(b) A person who conspires with or aids and abets another to commit any act described in subdivision (a) is guilty of a public offense and subject to the punishment described in subdivision (a).

(c) The board may post an administrative citation issued pursuant to Section 148 on the board’s internet website for an offense described in subdivisions (a) and (b).

(d) The remedy provided in this section shall not preclude any other remedy provided by law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 483, Sec. 38.   (SB 1453)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1701.5.

(a) Any dentist who as a sole proprietor, dentists who are organized as an association, partnership, or group, or a dental corporation that desires to practice under any name that would otherwise be in violation of Section 1701 may practice under this name if the dentist, association, partnership, group, or dental corporation obtains and maintains in current status a fictitious name permit issued by the board under this section.

(b) To obtain or renew a fictitious name permit, the dentist, association, partnership, group, or dental corporation shall apply to the board on an application form prescribed by the board and provide all of the following information:

(1) The names, license
 numbers, and contact information for each applicant engaging in practice under the fictitious name.

(2) The address of the place or establishment, or the portion thereof, where the applicant or applicants practice under the fictitious name.

(3) Evidence that the place or establishment, or the portion thereof, identified in paragraph (2) is owned or leased by the applicant or applicants, and the practice conducted at the place or establishment, or portion thereof, is wholly owned and entirely controlled by the applicant or applicants.

(4) The fictitious name under which the applicant or applicants propose to engage in dental practice that contains at least one of the following designations: “dental group,” “dental practice,” “dental office,” or “dental corporation,” as applicable pursuant to Section 1804, and is in
 conformity with Section 651 and subdivisions (i) and (l) of Section 1680.

(c) All applicants shall hold an active license that is not subject to any pending license enforcement action.

(d) Initial permit application and renewal fees shall be submitted to the board in accordance with Section 1724.5.

(e) A permit issued under this section by the board shall be issued for a two-year term.

(f) Any permit issued under this section may be revoked or suspended at any time that the board finds that any one of the requirements for original issuance of a permit is no longer being fulfilled by the holder to whom the permit was issued. Proceedings for revocation or suspension shall be governed by Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of
 Title 2 of the Government Code.

(g) A fictitious name permit issued to a dentist as the sole proprietor shall be suspended or revoked in the event the dentist’s license to practice dentistry is suspended or revoked.

(h) In the event charges of unprofessional conduct are filed against a member of an association, or partnership, group, or dental corporation to whom a permit has been issued under this section, proceedings shall not be commenced for revocation or suspension of the permit issued under this section until final determination of the charges of unprofessional conduct and unless the charges have resulted in revocation or suspension of the member’s license, registration, or permit.

(i) Any departures of dentists engaged in practice under the fictitious name shall be reported by the departing dentist to the
 board within 30 days of such departure. If a departing dentist is the dentist whose family name was used in the fictitious name, the departing dentist shall be removed as a permitholder, as applicable, and the remaining permitholders shall apply to the board to change the fictitious name to remove only the family name of the departing dentist.

(j) If an additional dentist desires to engage in practice under the fictitious name, the fictitious name permit shall be canceled and a new fictitious name permit application shall be submitted to the board.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 483, Sec. 40.   (SB 1453)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1702.

Nothing in this article shall prohibit the conferring of degrees and the bestowing of diplomas by reputable dental colleges of this State which have been approved by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1937, Ch. 415.)
-------------------------------------------

1703.

The board, or any member or officer thereof, may prefer a complaint for violation of this chapter, or any part thereof, before any court of competent jurisdiction, and may by its officers, counsel and agents, assist in presenting the law or facts at the trial. The district attorney of each county in this State shall prosecute all violations of this chapter in their respective counties in which the violations occur.

(History: Added by Stats. 1937, Ch. 415.)
-------------------------------------------

1705.

In addition to the other proceedings provided for in this chapter, the superior court of any county, on application of the board, shall issue an injunction to restrain any unlicensed person from carrying on or conducting the practice of dentistry as defined in this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1937, Ch. 415.)
-------------------------------------------

1705.5.

Whenever any person has engaged or is about to engage in any acts or practices which constitute or will constitute an offense against this chapter, the superior court of any county, on application of 10 or more persons holding licenses to practice dentistry issued under this chapter, may issue an injunction or other appropriate order restraining such conduct. Proceedings under this section shall be governed by Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 525) of Title 7 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 517, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

1706.

(a) Every complete upper or lower denture fabricated by a licensed dentist, or fabricated pursuant to the dentist’s work order, shall be marked with the patient’s name, unless the patient objects. The initials of the patient may be shown alone, if use of the name of the patient is not practical. The markings shall be done during fabrication and shall be permanent, legible, and cosmetically acceptable. The exact location of the markings and the methods used to implant or apply them shall be determined by the dentist or dental laboratory fabricating the denture.

(b) The dentist shall inform the patient that the markings are to be used for identification only and that the patient shall have the option to decide whether or not the dentures shall be marked.

(c) The dentist shall retain the records of those marked dentures and shall not release the records to any person except to enforcement officers, in the event of an emergency requiring personal identification by means of dental records, or to anyone authorized by the patient.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 182, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

1707.

(a) If upon investigation, the board has probable cause to believe that a person, company, or association is advertising with respect to the offering or provision of an educational program or course that requires board approval without being properly approved by the board to offer or provide the educational program or course, the board may issue a citation in accordance with Section 148.

(b) Each citation issued pursuant to subdivision (a) may contain:

(1) An assessment of an administrative fine. Administrative fines shall range from fifty dollars ($50) to five thousand dollars ($5,000), inclusive, for each violation. Any sanction authorized for activity under this section shall be
 separate from and in addition to any other civil or criminal remedies.

(2) An order of correction that requires the violator to do both of the following:

(A) Cease the unlawful advertising.

(B) Notify the telephone company furnishing services to the violator to disconnect the telephone service furnished to any telephone number contained in the unlawful advertising.

(c) This action is stayed if the person to whom a citation is issued under subdivision (a) notifies the board in writing that they intend to contest the citation. The board shall afford an opportunity for a hearing, as specified in Section 125.9.

(d) If the person to whom a citation and order of correction is issued under
 subdivision (a) fails to comply with the order of correction after that order is final, the board shall inform the Public Utilities Commission of the violation and the Public Utilities Commission shall require the telephone corporation furnishing services to that person, company, or association to disconnect the telephone service furnished to any telephone number contained in the unlawful advertising.

(e) The good faith compliance by a telephone corporation with an order of the Public Utilities Commission to terminate service issued pursuant to this section shall constitute a complete defense to any civil or criminal action brought against the telephone corporation arising from the termination of service.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 483, Sec. 41.   (SB 1453)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Fees [1715. - 1725.]

1715.

Licenses issued under the provisions of this chapter, unless specifically excepted, expire at 12 midnight on the legal birth date of a licentiate of the board during the second year of a two-year term if not renewed.

The board shall establish procedures for the administration of the birth date renewal program, including, but not limited to, the establishment of a pro rata formula for the payment of fees by licentiates affected by the implementation of such program and the establishment of a system of staggered license expiration dates such that a relatively equal number of licenses expire annually.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1189.)
-------------------------------------------

1715.1.

The provisions of Sections 1715, 1716, 1717, 1718, 1718.1, 1718.2, and 1718.3 shall also apply to and govern the expiration, renewal, restoration, reinstatement, and reissuance of permission to conduct an additional place of practice.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1270.)
-------------------------------------------

1715.5.

(a) A licensee shall, upon his or her initial licensure and any subsequent application for renewal, report the completion of any advanced educational program accredited by the Committee on Dental Accreditation in a dental specialty recognized by the American Dental Association.

(b) The licensee shall also report, upon his or her initial licensure and any subsequent application for renewal, the practice or employment status of the licensee, designated as one of the following:

(1) Full-time practice or employment in a dental practice of 32 hours per week or more in California. This
 reporting requirement shall also apply to a dental auxiliary licensee.

(2) Full-time practice or employment in a dental practice outside of California.

(3) Part-time practice or employment in a dental practice for less than 32 hours per week in California.

(4) Dental administrative employment that does not include direct patient care, as may further be defined by the board.

(5) Retired.

(6) Other practice or employment status, as may be further defined by the board.

(c) Information collected pursuant to subdivision (b) shall be posted
 on the Internet Web site of the board.

(d) (1) A licensee may report, in his or her application for renewal, and the board
 shall collect, information regarding the licensee’s cultural background and foreign language proficiency.

(2) Information collected pursuant to this subdivision shall be aggregated on an annual basis, based on categories utilized by the board in the collection of the data, into both statewide totals and ZIP Code of primary practice or employment location totals.

(3) Aggregated information under this subdivision shall be compiled annually, and reported on the Internet Web site of the board on or before July 1 of each year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 799, Sec. 3.   (SB 1575)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

1716.

Nothing contained in this chapter shall exempt from the payment of the renewal fee any person authorized to practice dentistry in the State of California, and every person practicing dentistry in this State shall pay the renewal fee irrespective of the time when he was licensed or first had the right to lawfully practice dentistry in this State or elsewhere.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 364.)
-------------------------------------------

1716.1.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 1716, the board may, by regulation, reduce the renewal fee for a licensee who has practiced dentistry for 20 years or more in this state, has reached the age of retirement under the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 301 et seq.), and customarily provides his or her services free of charge to any person, organization, or agency. In the event that charges are made, these charges shall be nominal. In no event shall the aggregate of these charges in any single calendar year be in an amount that would render the licensee ineligible for full social security benefits. The board shall not reduce the renewal fee under this section to an amount less than one-half of the regular renewal fee.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 1716, any licensee who demonstrates to the satisfaction of the board that he or she is unable to practice dentistry due to a disability, may request a waiver of 50 percent of the renewal fee. The granting of a waiver shall be at the discretion of the board, and the board may terminate the waiver at any time. A licensee to whom the board has granted a waiver pursuant to this subdivision shall not engage in the practice of dentistry unless and until the licensee pays the current renewal fee in full and establishes to the satisfaction of the board, on a form prescribed by the board and signed under penalty of perjury, that the licensee’s disability either no longer exists or no longer affects his or her ability to safely practice dentistry.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 728, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

1717.

To renew an unexpired license, the licensee shall, before the time at which the license would otherwise expire, apply for renewal on a form prescribed by the board and pay the renewal fee prescribed by this chapter. The receipt of the executive officer shall be indispensable evidence that payment has been made.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 47, Sec. 12.   Effective March 21, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

1718.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, an expired license may be renewed at any time within five years after its expiration on filing of application for renewal on a form prescribed by the board, and payment of all accrued renewal and delinquency fees. If the license is renewed more than 30 days after its expiration, the licensee, as a condition precedent to renewal, shall also pay the delinquency fee prescribed by this chapter. Renewal under this section shall be effective on the date on which the application is filed, on the date on which the renewal fee is paid, or on the date on which the delinquency fee, if any, is paid, whichever last occurs. If so renewed, the license shall continue in effect through the expiration date provided in Section 1715 which next occurs after the effective date of the renewal, when it shall expire if it is not again renewed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 607, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1718.1.

A suspended license is subject to expiration and shall be renewed as provided in this article, but such renewal does not entitle the licensee, while the license remains suspended and until it is reinstated, to engage in the licensed activity, or in any other activity or conduct in violation of the order or judgment by which the license was suspended.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 364.)
-------------------------------------------

1718.2.

A revoked license is subject to expiration as provided in this article, but it may not be renewed. If it is reinstated after its expiration, the licensee, as a condition precedent to its reinstatement, shall pay a reinstatement fee in an amount equal to the renewal fee in effect on the last regular renewal date before the date on which it is reinstated, plus the delinquency fee, if any, accrued at the time of its revocation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 364.)
-------------------------------------------

1718.3.

A license that is not renewed within five years after its expiration shall be canceled and shall not be renewed, restored, reinstated, or reissued thereafter, but the holder of the license may apply for and obtain a new license if the following requirements are satisfied:

(a) No fact, circumstance, or condition exists which would justify denial of licensure under Section 480.

(b) The licenseholder pays all of the fees that would be required if the licenseholder were then applying for the license for the first time and all delinquency fees, if any, that have accrued since the date on which the licenseholder last renewed the license. Delinquency fees shall not accrue after the license has been canceled pursuant to this
 section. 

(c) The licenseholder applies for licensure, as a new applicant, through one of the available licensing pathways under this division and meets all the requirements for licensure outlined therein.

(d) For purposes of subdivision (c), a licenseholder who was previously eligible for examination pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 1628 shall be eligible to take the examination required by Section 1632 pursuant to the terms of subdivision (e) of Section 1628.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 483, Sec. 42.   (SB 1453)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1719.

Upon collection by the proper officer of the court, 75 percent of the fines or forfeitures of bail in any case in which any person is charged with a violation of the provisions of this chapter shall be paid to the executive officer of the board and the balance, or 25 percent of the fines or forfeitures of bail, shall be paid to the county where the action is tried.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 47, Sec. 13.   Effective March 21, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

1720.

The executive officer shall on or before the 10th day of each month pay to the State Treasury and report to the Controller all fines, penalties, and forfeitures received for violations of this chapter, together with all examination, renewal, and license fees received by him or her prior to the date of the report and payment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 47, Sec. 14.   Effective March 21, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

1721.

Except as provided in Sections 1944 and 1945, all funds received by the Treasurer under the authority of this chapter shall be placed in the State Dentistry Fund. Expenditure of those funds shall be subject to appropriation by the Legislature in the annual Budget Act. Subject to that appropriation, and except as provided in Sections 1944 and 1945, all disbursements by the board made in the transaction of its business and in the enforcement of this chapter shall be paid out of the fund upon claims against the state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 865, Sec. 46.   (AB 1519)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

1721.5.

All funds received by the Treasurer pursuant to Section 1725 shall be placed in the State Dentistry Fund for the purposes of administering this chapter as it relates to dental assistants, registered dental assistants, registered dental assistants in extended functions, dental sedation assistant permitholders, and orthodontic assistant permitholders. Expenditure of these funds shall be subject to appropriation by the Legislature in the annual Budget Act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 865, Sec. 47.   (AB 1519)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

1722.

The amount of seven hundred dollars ($700) of the fund shall constitute a revolving fund and may be drawn upon the warrant of the president and secretary of the board without being audited in the usual manner, in cases of emergency or where cash advances are necessary. However, after the sum of seven hundred dollars ($700) has been so expended, no further warrant shall be drawn on the revolving fund until expenditures previously made from it shall be substantiated by vouchers and itemized statements and audited. All expenditures from the revolving fund shall, at the end of each fiscal year, or at any other time when demand therefor is made by the Director of Finance or by the State Controller, be so substantiated and audited unless previously done.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 320, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

1723.

All fines, penalties, and forfeitures, including the examination fee, imposed or collected by the board under any provision of this chapter shall be paid to the executive officer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 47, Sec. 15.   Effective March 21, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

1724.

The amount of charges and fees for dentists licensed pursuant to this chapter shall be established by the board as is necessary for the purpose of carrying out the responsibilities required by this chapter as it relates to dentists, subject to the following limitations:

(a) The fee for an application for licensure qualifying pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 1632 shall not exceed one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500). The fee for an application for licensure qualifying pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) of Section 1632 shall not exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000).

(b) The fee for an application for licensure qualifying pursuant to Section 1634.1 shall not exceed one thousand dollars
 ($1,000).

(c) The fee for an application for licensure qualifying pursuant to Section 1635.5 shall not exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000).

(d) The fee for an initial license and for the renewal of a license is five hundred twenty-five dollars ($525). On and after January 1, 2016, the fee for an initial license shall not exceed six hundred fifty dollars ($650), and the fee for the renewal of a license shall not exceed six hundred fifty dollars ($650). On and after January 1, 2018, the fee for an initial license shall not exceed eight hundred dollars ($800), and the fee for the renewal of a license shall not exceed eight hundred dollars ($800).

(e) The fee for an application for a special permit shall not exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000), and the renewal fee for a special permit shall not exceed six hundred
 dollars ($600).

(f) The delinquency fee shall be 50 percent of the renewal fee for such a license or permit in effect on the date of the renewal of the license or permit.

(g) The penalty for late registration of change of place of practice shall not exceed seventy-five dollars ($75).

(h) The fee for an application for an additional office permit shall not exceed seven hundred fifty dollars ($750), and the fee for the renewal of an additional office permit shall not exceed three hundred seventy-five dollars ($375).

(i) The fee for issuance of a replacement pocket license, replacement wall certificate, or replacement engraved certificate shall not exceed one hundred twenty-five dollars ($125).

(j) The fee for a provider of continuing education shall not exceed five hundred dollars ($500) per year.

(k) The fee for application for a referral service permit and for renewal of that permit shall not exceed twenty-five dollars ($25).

(l) The fee for application for an extramural facility permit and for the renewal of a permit shall not exceed twenty-five dollars ($25).

(m) The fee for an application for an elective facial cosmetic surgery permit shall not exceed four thousand dollars ($4,000), and the fee for the renewal of an elective facial cosmetic surgery permit shall not exceed eight hundred dollars ($800).

(n) The fee for an application for an oral and maxillofacial surgery permit shall not exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000),
 and the fee for the renewal of an oral and maxillofacial surgery permit shall not exceed one thousand two hundred dollars ($1,200).

(o) The fee for an application for a general anesthesia permit shall not exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000), and the fee for the renewal of a general anesthesia permit shall not exceed six hundred dollars ($600).

(p) The fee for an onsite inspection and evaluation related to a general anesthesia or moderate sedation permit shall not exceed four thousand five hundred dollars ($4,500).

(q) The fee for an application for a moderate sedation permit shall not exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000), and the fee for the renewal of a moderate sedation permit shall not exceed six hundred dollars ($600).

(r) The fee for an
 application for an adult oral conscious sedation certificate shall not exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000), and the fee for the renewal of an adult oral conscious sedation certificate shall not exceed six hundred dollars ($600).

(s) The fee for an application for a pediatric minimal sedation permit shall not exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000), and the fee for the renewal of a pediatric minimal sedation permit shall not exceed six hundred dollars ($600).

(t) The fee for an application for a pediatric endorsement for a general anesthesia permit or moderate sedation permit shall not exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000), and the fee for the renewal of a pediatric endorsement shall not exceed six hundred dollars ($600). 

(u) The fee for a certification of licensure shall not exceed one hundred twenty-five dollars
 ($125).
